Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-226
Department; powers,
functions, and duties.

The department shall have
the following powers, functions, and duties:

(1) To issue licenses, temporary licenses, and permits;

(2) To deny any license or permit application or renewal license
application for cause. Cause for denial of an application or renewal of a
license shall include instances in which the applicant individually or, in
the case of a business entity or a nonprofit organization, any officer, director,
employee, or limited liability company member of the applicant, licensee,
or permittee, other than an employee whose duties are purely ministerial in
nature, any other person or entity directly or indirectly associated with
such applicant, licensee, or permittee which directly or indirectly receives
compensation other than distributions from a bona fide retirement or pension
plan established pursuant to Chapter 1, subchapter D of the Internal Revenue
Code from such applicant for past or present services in a consulting capacity
or otherwise, the licensee, or any person with a substantial interest in the
applicant, licensee, or permittee:

(a) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations,
or duties imposed by the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the State Lottery
Act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the acts;

(b) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another
to cause any person to violate any of the provisions of such acts or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts;

(c) Obtained a license or permit pursuant to such acts by
fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment;

(d) Was convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a felony
or misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft, willful failure
to make required payments or reports, or filing false reports with a governmental
agency at any level;

(e) Was convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony other than those described
in subdivision (d) of this subdivision within the ten years preceding the
filing of the application;

(f) Denied the department or its authorized representatives,
including authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where bingo
activity required to be licensed or for which a permit is required under the
Nebraska Bingo Act is being conducted or failed to produce for inspection
or audit any book, record, document, or item required by law, rule, or regulation;

(g) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material
fact to the department;

(h) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence his,
her, or its qualifications to be licensed or granted a permit in accordance
with the Nebraska Bingo Act;

(i) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including
penalties and interest, required by the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County
and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska
Pickle Card Lottery Act or any other taxes imposed pursuant to the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967;

(j) Failed to pay an administrative fine levied pursuant to
the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska
Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act;

(k) Failed to demonstrate good character, honesty, and integrity;

(l) Failed to demonstrate, either individually or, in the
case of a business entity or a nonprofit organization, through its managers,
employees, or agents, the ability, experience, or financial responsibility
necessary to establish or maintain the activity for which the application
is made; or

(m) Was cited and whose liquor license was suspended, canceled,
or revoked by the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission for illegal gambling
activities that occurred on or after July 20, 2002, on or about a premises
licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or
the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.

No renewal of a license under the Nebraska Bingo Act shall
be issued when the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license
upon a first application;

(3) To revoke, cancel, or suspend for cause any license or
permit. Cause for revocation, cancellation, or suspension of a license or
permit shall include instances in which the licensee or permittee individually
or, in the case of a business entity or a nonprofit organization, any officer,
director, employee, or limited liability company member of the licensee or
permittee, other than an employee whose duties are purely ministerial in nature,
any other person or entity directly or indirectly associated with such licensee
or permittee which directly or indirectly receives compensation other than
distributions from a bona fide retirement or pension plan established pursuant
to Chapter 1, subchapter D of the Internal Revenue Code from such licensee
or permittee for past or present services in a consulting capacity or otherwise,
or any person with a substantial interest in the licensee or permittee:

(a) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations,
or duties imposed by the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery
Act, or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such
acts;

(b) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another
to cause any person to violate any of the provisions of the Nebraska Bingo
Act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;

(c) Obtained a license or permit pursuant to the Nebraska
Bingo Act by fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment;

(d) Was convicted of, forfeited bond upon the charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a felony
or a misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft, willful
failure to make required payments or reports, or filing false reports with
a governmental agency at any level;

(e) Was convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony other than those described
in subdivision (d) of this subdivision within the ten years preceding the
filing of the application;

(f) Denied the department or its authorized representatives,
including authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where bingo
activity required to be licensed or for which a permit is required under the
Nebraska Bingo Act is being conducted or failed to produce for inspection
or audit any book, record, document, or item required by law, rule, or regulation;

(g) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material
fact to the department;

(h) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including
penalties and interest, required by the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County
and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska
Pickle Card Lottery Act or any other taxes imposed pursuant to the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967;

(i) Failed to pay an administrative fine levied pursuant to
the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska
Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act;

(j) Failed to demonstrate good character, honesty, and integrity;

(k) Failed to demonstrate, either individually or, in the
case of a business entity or a nonprofit organization, through its managers,
employees, or agents, the ability, experience, or financial responsibility
necessary to maintain the activity for which the license was issued; or

(l) Was cited and whose liquor license was suspended, canceled,
or revoked by the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission for illegal gambling
activities that occurred on or after July 20, 2002, on or about a premises
licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or
the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act;

(4) To issue an order requiring a licensee, permittee, or
other person to cease and desist from violations of the Nebraska Bingo Act
or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.
The order shall give reasonable notice of the rights of the licensee, permittee,
or other person to request a hearing and shall state the reason for the entry
of the order. The notice of order to cease and desist shall be mailed to or personally
served upon the licensee, permittee, or other person. If the notice of order
is mailed, the date
the notice is mailed shall be deemed to be the date of service of notice to
the licensee, permittee, or other person. A request for a hearing by the licensee,
permittee, or other person shall be in writing and shall be filed with the
department within thirty days after the service of the cease and desist order.
If a request for hearing is not filed within the thirty-day period, the cease
and desist order shall become permanent at the expiration of such period.
A hearing shall be held not later than thirty days after the request for the
hearing is received by the Tax Commissioner, and within twenty days after
the date of the hearing, the Tax Commissioner shall issue an order vacating
the cease and desist order or making it permanent as the facts require. All
hearings shall be held in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated by the department. If the licensee, permittee, or other person
to whom a cease and desist order is issued fails to appear at the hearing
after being duly notified, the licensee, permittee, or other person shall
be deemed in default and the proceeding may be determined against the licensee,
permittee, or other person upon consideration of the cease and desist order,
the allegations of which may be deemed to be true;

(5) To levy an administrative fine on an individual, partnership,
limited liability company, corporation, or organization for cause. For purposes
of this subdivision, cause shall include instances in which the individual,
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or organization violated
the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations, or duties imposed by
the act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the
act. In determining whether to levy an administrative fine and the amount
of the fine if any fine is levied, the department shall take into consideration
the seriousness of the violation, the intent of the violator, whether the
violator voluntarily reported the violation, whether the violator derived
financial gain as a result of the violation and the extent thereof, and whether
the violator has had previous violations of the act, rules, or regulations.
A fine levied on a violator under this section shall not exceed one thousand
dollars for each violation of the act or any rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated pursuant to the act plus the financial benefit derived by the
violator as a result of each violation. If an administrative fine is levied,
the fine shall not be paid from bingo gross receipts of an organization and
shall be remitted by the violator to the department within thirty days after
the date of the order issued by the department levying such fine;

(6) To enter or to authorize any law enforcement officer to
enter at any time upon any premises where bingo activity required to be licensed
or for which a permit is required under the act is being conducted to determine
whether any of the provisions of the act or any rules or regulations adopted
and promulgated under the act have been or are being violated and at such
time to examine such premises;

(7) To require periodic reports of bingo activity from licensees
under the act as the department deems necessary to carry out the act;

(8) To examine or to cause to have examined, by any agent
or representative designated by the department for such purpose, any books,
papers, records, or memoranda relating to bingo activities of any licensee
or permittee, to require by administrative order or summons the production
of such documents or the attendance of any person having knowledge in the
premises, to take testimony under oath, and to acquire proof material for
its information. If any such person willfully refuses to make documents available
for examination by the department or its agent or representative or willfully
fails to attend and testify, the department may apply to a judge of the district
court of the county in which such person resides for an order directing such
person to comply with the department's request. If any documents requested
by the department are in the custody of a corporation, the court order may
be directed to any principal officer of the corporation. If the documents
requested by the department are in the custody of a limited liability company,
the court order may be directed to any member when management is reserved
to the members or otherwise to any manager. Any person who fails or refuses
to obey such a court order shall be guilty of contempt of court;

(9) Unless specifically provided otherwise, to compute, determine,
assess, and collect the amounts required to be paid to the state as taxes
imposed by the act in the same manner as provided for sales and use taxes
in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967;

(10) To collect license application, license renewal application,
and permit fees imposed by the Nebraska Bingo Act and to prorate license fees
on an annual basis. The department shall establish by rule and regulation
the conditions and circumstances under which such fees may be prorated;

(11) To confiscate and seize bingo supplies and equipment
pursuant to section 9-262.01; and

(12) To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations, prescribe
such forms, and employ such staff, including inspectors, as are necessary
to carry out the act.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 52;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 58;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 36;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-187;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 27;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 11;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 45;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 26;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 1126, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 1.
April 12, 2012
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Liquor Control Act, see section 53-101.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.

The Department of Revenue has the authority to deny licenses for reasons of unlawful donations to a retirement plan and unlawful salary advances. Southeast Rur. Vol. Fire Dept. v. Neb. Dept. of Rev., 251 Neb. 852, 560 N.W.2d 436 (1997).